Hawaii statutes.
§653-9 Service on beneficiary. Service
of process upon the beneficiary may be made as has been usual or shall be
provided in the case of civil actions in general. [L 1890, c 50, §7; RL 1925,
§2852; RL 1935, §4298; RL 1945, §10329; RL 1955, §238-9; HRS §653-9]

Case Notes

Cited: 34 H. 328, 330 (1937).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next